Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.250

Authority restricted to person named in license—Exceptions.

No license issued under the provisions of this chapter shall authorize any person other than the person to whom it is issued to do any act by virtue thereof nor to operate in any other manner than under his or her own name except:

(1) A licensed mortgage broker may operate or advertise under a name other than the one under which the license is issued by obtaining the written consent of the director to do so; and

(2) A broker may establish one or more branch offices under a name or names different from that of the main office if the name or names are approved by the director, so long as each branch office is clearly identified as a branch or division of the main office. Both the name of the branch office and of the main office must clearly appear on the sign identifying the office, if any, and in any advertisement or on any letterhead of any stationery or any forms, or signs used by the mortgage firm on which either the name of the main or branch offices appears.

[ 1997 c 106 s 17; 1993 c 468 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 106: See note following RCW 19.146.010.

Adoption of rules—Severability—1993 c 468: See notes following RCW 19.146.0201.

Effective dates—1993 c 468: See note following RCW 19.146.200.